Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.150

Unfair labor practices for bargaining representative enumerated.

It shall be an unfair labor practice for a bargaining representative:

(1) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce public employees in the exercise of their rights guaranteed by this chapter;

(2) To induce the public employer to commit an unfair labor practice;

(3) To discriminate against a public employee who has filed an unfair labor practice charge;

(4) To refuse to engage in collective bargaining.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 215 s 2.]